Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Requirements.

Sec. 29.05.010.
Home rules cities. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 29.05.011.
Incorporation of a city.

A community that meets the following standards may incorporate as a first class or home rule city:

the community has 400 or more permanent residents;

the boundaries of the proposed city include all areas necessary to provide municipal services on an efficient scale;

the economy of the community includes the human and financial resources necessary to provide municipal services; in considering the economy of the community, the Local Boundary Commission shall consider property values, economic base, personal income, resource and commercial development, anticipated functions, and the expenses and income of the proposed city, including the ability of the community to generate local revenue;

the population of the community is stable enough to support city government;

there is a demonstrated need for city government.

A community that meets all the standards under (a) of this section except (a)(1) may incorporate as a second class city.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for incorporation of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 1.

Sec. 29.05.020.
Legislative powers of home rule cities. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 29.05.021.
Limitations on incorporation of a city.

A community in the unorganized borough may not incorporate as a city if the services to be provided by the proposed city can be provided by annexation to an existing city.

A community within a borough may not incorporate as a city if the services to be provided by the proposed city can be provided on an areawide or nonareawide basis by the borough in which the proposed city is located, or by annexation to an existing city.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for incorporation of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 1.

Sec. 29.05.030.
General law cities. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 29.05.031.
Incorporation of a borough or unified municipality.

An area that meets the following standards may incorporate as a home rule, first class, or second class borough, or as a unified municipality:

the population of the area is interrelated and integrated as to its social, cultural, and economic activities, and is large and stable enough to support borough government;

the boundaries of the proposed borough or unified municipality conform generally to natural geography and include all areas necessary for full development of municipal services;

the economy of the area includes the human and financial resources capable of providing municipal services; evaluation of an area’s economy includes land use, property values, total economic base, total personal income, resource and commercial development, anticipated functions, expenses, and income of the proposed borough or unified municipality;

land, water, and air transportation facilities allow the communication and exchange necessary for the development of integrated borough government.

An area may not incorporate as a third class borough.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For mandatory formation of certain boroughs, see § 3, ch. 52, SLA 1963 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for incorporation of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 2.

For standards for deunification, see 3 AAC 110, art. 11.

Sec. 29.05.040.
Legislative powers of general law cities. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]